Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Local Financial Support

Cross references. —

As to financial duties of boards of trustees, see §

21-3-110

.

As to special school tax for vocational education, see §§

21-12-103

and

21-12-104

.

As to tax levy to pay school bonds, see §

21-13-713

.

As to community college districts, see §

21-18-301

et seq.

As to special school district tax for board of cooperative educational services, see §

21-20-109

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts § 517.

§ 21-13-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Average daily membership” or “ADM” means the aggregate number of pupils present plus the aggregate number of pupils absent, divided by the actual number of days the school is in session for the year. Pupils who attend at least eighty percent (80%) of a full time equivalency basis shall be considered full time. For pupils enrolled in school on less than eighty percent (80%) of a full time equivalency basis, the school district shall calculate the pupil’s contribution to the ADM on a prorated basis with the hours or class periods of enrollment being the numerator and the hours or class periods of full time equivalency being the denominator. Pupils who have withdrawn from school or who have been absent for more than ten (10) consecutive calendar days shall not be counted as members;

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 304.

“District” means any school district as defined by law;

“Elementary school” means a school consisting of kindergarten through grade five (5), or any appropriate combination of grades within this range, as determined by the plan of organization for schools authorized by the district board of trustees;

“Foundation program” means the level of funding which is to be made available to each district under this article so that each district is able to comply with the state uniform educational program standards imposed under W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and the uniform state student content and performance standards prescribed by the state board of education under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii);

“High school” means a school consisting of grades nine (9) through twelve (12), or any combination of grades within this range, as determined by the plan of organization by the district board;

“Middle school” means a school consisting of grades six (6) through eight (8), or any combination of grades within this range, as determined by the plan of organization by the district board;

“Kindergarten” means a class of pre-first-grade students;

“Public school foundation program account” and “foundation account” mean the account created by W.S.

21-13-306

for use in financing education in public schools;

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 17, § 2.

“Teacher” means any member of the teaching or professional staff engaged in the service of the public schools for whom certification is required as a condition of employment;

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 82, § 2.

“Year of college training” shall be the successful completion of a one (1) year course of study approved by the state department of education;

“Education resource block grant model” means the block grant model for Wyoming school finance contained within the enumeration of model components summarizing and executing recommendations within the 2010 cost of education study as modified by the legislature and as referenced in paragraph (xvii) of this subsection. “Education resource block grant model” or “model” includes model spreadsheets updated with technical corrections, all of which are enacted into law, on file with the secretary of state and are maintained and made available for public inspection by the state superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(e), and as may be subsequently modified by the legislature prior to future model recalibration required under W.S. 21-13-309(t);

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

“Prototypical school model” means a school level, comprised of cost, resource and enrollment parameters, as described within the education resource block grant model. The separate school levels identified with the model are as follows:

Elementary school - kindergarten through grade five (5) modeled at cost and resource levels for:

Greater than forty-nine (49) ADM;

Ninety-six (96) ADM;

One hundred ninety-two (192) ADM; and

Two hundred eighty-eight (288) ADM.

Middle school - grades six (6) through eight (8) modeled at cost and resource levels for:

Greater than forty-nine (49) ADM;

One hundred five (105) ADM;

Two hundred ten (210) ADM; and

Three hundred fifteen (315) ADM.

High school - grades nine (9) through twelve (12) modeled at cost and resource levels for:

Greater than forty-nine (49) ADM;

One hundred five (105) ADM;

Two hundred ten (210) ADM;

Three hundred fifteen (315) ADM; and

Six hundred thirty (630) ADM.

“Attachment A” to 2011 House Bill 0127 as amended by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99 consists of an enumeration of model components as enacted into law, summarizing and executing recommendations contained within the 2010 cost of education study, as modified by the legislature, and is hereby incorporated into this chapter by this reference;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 185, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 2, § 203.

The education resource block grant model as defined under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section and as included in “Attachment A” referenced in paragraph (a)(xvii) of this section, as each are enacted into law, and including any technical correction which may be implemented by rule and regulation of the state superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(e), shall be filed with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-63; Laws 1959, ch. 67, § 1; 1961, ch. 192, § 1; 1963, ch. 72, § 1; 1967, ch. 109, § 4; 1969, ch. 111, § 228; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-228; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

21-13-305

; Laws 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1988, ch. 82, § 2; 1994, ch. 17, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 303, 304, 501; 1998, ch. 2, §§ 202, 203; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 58, § 1; ch. 76, § 2; 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2011, ch. 185, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2017 ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (a)(vii), (xiv) and (xvi) concerning “Kindergarten,” “Education resource block grant model,” and “Prototypical school model,”; and repealed former (a)(xv), which read: “‘Necessary small school’ means as determined in W.S.

21-13-318

”; added (a)(xvii) and (xviii); and added (c).

The 2007 amendment,

in (a) substituted “chapter” for “article.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xiv), substituted “2010” for “2005,” and substituted “all of which are enacted into law, on file with the secretary of state and are maintained and made available for public inspection by the state superintendent under
W.S.

21-2-202

(e)” for “referenced in paragraph (xviii) of this subsection, all of which are enacted into law and are on file with the secretary of state”; in (a)(xvii), substituted “2011 House Bill 0127” for “2006 House Bill 0139,” and substituted “2010” for “2005”; repealed former (a)(xviii), which read: “ ‘Attachment B’ to 2006 House Bill 0139 consists of the model spreadsheets, as enacted into law and as may from time to time be modified by the legislature, implementing the 2005 cost of education study and the enumeration of model components at Attachment A referenced in paragraph (xvii) of this subsection, and is hereby incorporated into this chapter by this reference”; and in (c), deleted “The secretary of state shall maintain and make available for public inspection in a hardcopy or electronic format, as applicable, or both, during regular business hours” at the beginning, deleted “and ‘Attachment B’ referenced in paragraph (a)(xviii) of this section” after “(a)(xvii) of this section,” and substituted “under
W.S.

21-2-202

(e), shall be filed with the secretary of state” for “and filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
W.S. 21-2-202.”

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (a)(xiv).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “21-2-304(a)(iii)” for “21-2-304(a)(v).”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(xiv), substituted “state superintendent” for “director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2017 amendment

in (a)(i) added the second sentence; in (a)(xiv) near the end of the first sentence added “as modified by the legislature and,” added “’Education resource block grant model’ or ‘model’ includes” at the beginning of the second sentence, substituted “updated with technical corrections” for “provided by the consultant performing the 2010 cost of education study” in the second sentence; in (a)(xcii) added “as amended by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99” in the first sentence; and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 9, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 4, provides: “[INSTRUCTIONAL FACILITATORS]

“(a) To augment amounts within the education resource block grant model available to districts for school-based instructional facilitators and instructional coaches during a transitional period during which full cost-based funding will be implemented and total professional development resources are being reviewed, and to assist schools with providing ongoing instructional coaching and instructional mentoring, a school district may apply to the department of education for a grant under this section on or before April 15, 2006, for school year 2006-2007, and on or before April 15, 2007, for school year 2007-2008. Application shall be on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department and application review and selection shall be in accordance with department rule and regulation. The department shall notify each district of its eligibility to participate in the grant program on or before May 1 of the school year preceding the school year for which application is made, together with any estimated amount to be made available to the district for the applicable school. The department shall distribute grant amounts to each eligible district on or before August 15, 2006, for the first school year of the grant program, and again on or before August 15, 2007, for the second school year of the grant program.

“(b) Grant amounts for school year 2006-2007 shall be based upon school level attendance and configuration reports submitted by each eligible school district pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv) for school year 2005-2006, as amended by section 1 of this act. Grant amounts for school year 2007-2008 shall be based upon school year 2006-2007 attendance and configuration reports. Grant amounts shall be computed by the department for the eligible applicant district as if the education resource block grant model contained the following component for instructional facilitators, prorated up and down from the FTE position level specified for each prototype similar to computational operation of other components within the block grant model:

“(i) One and one-half (1.5) FTE position in each 288 ADM prototypical elementary school within the qualifying district;

“(ii) One and one-half (1.5) FTE position in each 315 ADM prototypical middle school within the district; and

“(iii) One and one-half (1.5) FTE position in each 315 prototypical high school within the district;

“(iv) ‘FTE’ and ‘ADM’ as used in this section shall be as defined in ATTACHMENT ‘A’ to this act, as referenced in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii), as amended by section 1 of this act.

“(c) Grant payments to qualifying applicant school districts shall be made by the department from amounts within the foundation program account appropriated under subsection (e) of this section, and shall be in addition to the school year 2006-2007 and the school year 2007-2008 foundation program amount computed for that district under W.S. 21-13-309(p), as amended by section 1 of this act, as applicable. If there is an insufficient amount within the foundation program account from amounts appropriated under subsection (e) of this section for grant payments awarded under this section for any school year for which the grant program is authorized and funded by the legislature, the department shall make a pro rata reduction in district grant payments. District expenditures of amounts distributed under this section shall be solely for district instructional facilitation programs in accordance with the program documentation submitted by the district under subsection (a) of this section.

“(d) Each district shall report expenditures of amounts distributed under this section together with additional information required by the department on instructional facilitation strategies employed by the district, the impact of facilitation on student performance and an evaluation of the effectiveness of the facilitation strategies employed by the district. The department shall compile the information reported by districts under this subsection and on or before December 1, 2007, report the compilation to the joint education interim committee together with recommendations for future instructional facilitation funding.

“(e) Sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000.00) is appropriated from the school foundation program account to the department of education to fund payments under this section for school years 2006-2007 and 2007-2008.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

“Unified school district” under this section does not have to be the one legally organized

under chapter 5 of this title. Hankins v. District Boundary Bd., 502 P.2d 368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1972) (decided prior to 1974 amendment).

Quoted

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Sweetwater County Planning Comm. for Organization of School Dists. v. Hinkle, 491 P.2d 1234,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1971);
In re Seyfang, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

Validity of public school funding systems, 110 ALR5th 293.

§ 21-13-102.
Maximum rate of school district tax; recapture of excess; equalization of permissive levies.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the maximum rate of school district tax that may be levied for all school purposes, exclusive of bond interest and redemption, for any school district in any school year on each dollar of assessed valuation within the school district is as follows:

In a unified school district:

Twenty-five (25) mills shall be levied for combined elementary, junior high and high school purposes.

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 103(a).

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 104(a).

and (E) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

In any nonunified school district consisting of kindergarten through grade eight (8):

Twenty-five (25) mills shall be levied for school purposes.

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 103(a).

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 103.

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 104(a).

and (F) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

For each school year:

A school district whose revenues from the sources provided by W.S.

21-13-310

exceed the foundation program costs determined under W.S.

21-13-309

by more than three hundred percent (300%), as estimated to the districts on or before August 15 and as subsequently certified to the districts on or before March 1 of the current fiscal year under subsection (e) of this section, shall rebate fifty percent (50%) of the excess revenues to the department of education by January 15 of the applicable school year. The balance of the excess revenues shall be rebated to the department on or before June 25 of that school year;

A school district whose revenues specified under W.S.

21-13-310

for any school year exceed the foundation program costs determined under W.S.

21-13-309

by three hundred percent (300%) or less, as estimated and certified under subsection (e) of this section, shall rebate forty percent (40%) of the excess revenues to the department by January 15 of the applicable school year. The balance of the excess revenues shall be rebated to the department on or before June 25 of the applicable school year;

Amounts rebated under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be credited to the public school foundation program account defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(ix).

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 53, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 94, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 103(a).

Annually on or before August 15 the department shall notify each district subject to recapture of the estimated amount due to the state during the current fiscal year, using data from the previous school year. Upon receipt of the state assessed values by school districts, and not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall certify to each district subject to recapture the amount of recapture for the fiscal year to be remitted to the state. The amount certified shall supersede the estimates certified on or before August 15. If a district can demonstrate financial inability to make payments to the state as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction may adjust the schedule of payments provided by subsection (b) of this section if the financial integrity of the foundation program will not be jeopardized.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 29 § 1.

and (j) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 106, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 2783; R.S. 1931, § 115x–131; C.S. 1945, § 32x–207; Laws 1947, ch. 91, § 1; 1949, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 39x–58; Laws 1959, ch. 36, § 1; 1961, ch. 217, § 2; 1965, ch. 188, § 2; 1967, ch. 113, § 2; 1969, ch. 111, § 214; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1x–214; Laws 1973, ch. 165, § 1; 1974, ch. 15, § 1; 1975, ch. 96, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 6, § 1; 1977, ch. 79, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 21x–13x–101; Laws 1979, ch. 119, § 1; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1984, ch. 53, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 146, § 1; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1988, ch. 82, § 1; 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 1990, ch. 122, § 1; 1993, ch. 168, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1997, ch. 185, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 103, 104; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 1999, ch. 110, § 103(a) and (b); 2000, ch. 12, § 2(b); 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 17, § 1; ch. 94, §
2; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2021 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to state department of education, see §

21-2-104

.

As to state board of education, see §

21-2-301

and notes thereto.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, repealed former (a)(i)(D), (E), (ii)(E), and (F), pertaining to 1997 ad valorem tax levies certified under W.S. 39-13-104(k); repealed former (f), pertaining to a written report to the legislature and to the governor concerning the operation of the foundation program; repealed former (h) and (j), pertaining to additional amounts payable; and made stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 17, §
1, effective July 1, 2008, in (b), inserted “January 15, March 15 and May 15 of each year in equal payments of twenty-five percent (25%) and the balance to be paid on,” inserted “as estimated to the districts on or before August 15 and as subsequently.”

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 94, §
2, repealed former (c) which pertained to revenue amount to be rebated.

Laws 2008, ch. 94, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted present (b) for former (b), which read: “Except as otherwise provided by law, on January 15, March 15 and May 15 of each year in equal payments of twenty-five percent (25%) and the balance to be paid on June 15, each school district shall rebate to the department of education the amount by which the revenue from the sources provided by W.S.

21-13-310

exceeds the foundation program costs determined under W.S.

21-13-309

, as estimated to the districts on or before August 15 and as subsequently certified to the districts on or before March 1 of the current fiscal year under subsection (e) of this section, to be credited to the public school foundation program account defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(ix).”

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “superintendent of public instruction” in (e).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (e), substituted “superintendent of public instruction” for “director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "25" for "15" following "by June" in the last sentences of (b)(i) and (b)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 17, § 2, provides: “Nothing in this act is intended to be interpreted to modify the administration of school finance with respect to recapture payment schedules under
W.S. 21-13-102(b) and recapture district entitlement loan repayment schedules under
W.S. 21-13-313(g) for the
2007- 2008 school year.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, amending this section, states in relevant part: “in accordance with Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014”

Laws 2015, ch. 179, amending this section, states in relevant part: “conforming Wyoming Statute to Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

There is no specific authority for tax levied under section in state constitution

such as in the case of the state tax, the county tax for schools and the general county tax. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Absolute equality in funding school district per pupil not required. —

Each school district need not receive exactly the same number of dollars per pupil as every other school district, because exact or absolute equality is not required. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

“Unified school district”

did not have to be one legally organized under chapter 5 of this title, so that a de facto school district could validly cause an additional two mills authorized under a former provision of this section to be levied for school purposes. Hankins v. District Boundary Bd., 502 P.2d 368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1972).

Recapture. —

A school district subject to recapture is entitled to a rebate based on actual revenue received by the school district, regardless of the amounts assessed. Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole, 6 P.3d 1275,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2000).

Stated

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. One v. State, 985 P.2d 964,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1999); State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-103.
Cancellation of unpaid warrants; remedy of holders.

The treasurer of each school district shall on the first Monday in April of each year cancel all unpaid warrants of such school district which have been issued for a period exceeding twelve (12) months, and shall at the same time certify to the board of trustees of such school district the number and amount of each warrant which he has canceled. Such list of canceled warrants shall be entered in the minutes of the board and published at least once in a regular issue of a newspaper published in the county, during the month in which such warrants were canceled. Any person or persons holding a school district warrant which has been canceled under the provisions of this section, may present such warrant to the board of trustees of such school district at any subsequent time, not later than five (5) years after the date such warrant was canceled. The said board of trustees shall issue to the holder of such school district warrant, a new warrant covering the amount due on the original warrant at the time so canceled.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 100, § 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-215, 67-216; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-50, 21-51; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 215; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-215; W.S. 1977, §

21-13-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 136, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, ch. 136, § 1, effective June 30, 1983, renumbered former §

21-13-103

, which related to the audit of books and accounts of school districts (which was repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 3), as §

21-13-104

.

§ 21-13-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 216, related to audit of school district's books and accounts.